Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1770.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 4101 of Title 2, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Elk
Population Study and Management Act".
B. As used in this act:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1770 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. "Authority" refers to the Oklahoma State University
Veterinary Medicine Authority;
2. "Management plan" refers to a document developed based on
the findings of the study that outlines recommended actions for the
conservation and management of elk populations; and
3. "Study zone" refers to the Special Northwest Zone that
encompasses all private lands in Woodward, Dewey, and Ellis
Counties, and a portion of Roger Mills County north of State
Highways 33 and 47 to the north county line and west to the state
border and east to the county line.
C. No later than November 1, 2026, the Oklahoma State
University Veterinary Medicine Authority, in cooperation with the
OSU College of Veterinary Medicine, shall establish a plan and
outline for a comprehensive study of the elk population within the
Special Northwest Zone. The comprehensive study shall assess
current population levels, trends, and habitat usage, and develop
science-based management recommendations aimed at ensuring the long-
term sustainability of elk populations and the health of the
ecosystem. The comprehensive study shall include, but not be
limited to, the following program characteristics:
1. The current elk population size, distribution, and density
within the study zone;


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1770 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. The health and genetic diversity of the elk population,
including disease monitoring and signs of inbreeding or other health
concerns;
3. The effectiveness and impact of current elk population
management strategies, including hunting, predation control, and
habitat conservation; and
4. Recommendations culminating in the form of a management plan
for the conservation and management of elk populations within the
study zone.
D. The Authority may coordinate with other relevant state and
federal agencies to effectuate the provisions of this act. Such
coordination may include requests for temporary suspension and/or
restrictions of elk hunting or harvesting while the comprehensive
study is being conducted.
E. The Authority shall maintain detailed accounting and
financial records of appropriations received and expenditures made
pursuant to the purposes of this act. The Authority may engage
external experts and scientists to plan and implement the
comprehensive study. The engagement of such external experts shall
be implemented in accordance with the policies of the Authority.
The Authority is authorized to carry forward to a future fiscal year
any unexpended funds related to this act.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1770 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON AGRICULTURE AND WILDLIFE
April 6, 2026 - DO PASS



















SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1770 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)